District of Columbia statutes.
42-1235

Relation to electronic signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) or section 104 of the Act, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 103(b) of the Act. The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed as remedial legislation to encourage the use and recording of electronic documents affecting real property in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-25, § 6, 52 DCR 8084
Section 101(c) or section 104 of the Act, referred to in text, is classified to 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) and 15 U.S.C. § 7004. Section 103(b), referred to in text, is classified to 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.